Alabama, session 2026rs, SB12.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Act 2025-294, authorizing the annexation of
a specific community development district, is repealed.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 1

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
SB12 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB12
Senate 15-Jan-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 22-Jan-26




By: Senator Gudger
Page 2